Mississippi, session 2026, HB645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the administration of COVID-19 mRNA vaccinations is prohibited in Mississippi until the State Department of Health analyzes any existing data and concludes that the benefits of such vaccine outweigh the risks. (2)  The State Department of Health shall conduct a study and make recommendations on the benefits and risks of the administration of COVID-19 mRNA vaccinations.  Such analysis shall include, but not be limited to, a self-controlled case series that shall be completed within one (1) year after the effective date of this act.  Only if, after the conclusion of such analysis, the department determines that the administration of COVID-19 mRNA vaccinations are safe may the use of such vaccine continue. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.